Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1616
Act; applicability.

The Political Subdivisions Self-Funding Benefits Act shall not apply to coverage for workers' compensation.

Laws 1991, LB 167, § 16.

Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act, see section 48-1,110.